Hawaii, session 2025, HB838.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 302A-706, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  There is established within the department the teacher national board certification incentive program to recognize and support exemplary teaching practice by supporting public school teachers who have achieved national board certification under the certification program of the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards.  The teacher national board certification incentive program shall provide: (1)  A [$5,000] $10,000 bonus per year for each public school teacher who maintains current national board certification; (2)  $1,500 upon completing all components of the certification program of the National Board for Professional Teaching Standards; (3)  A reimbursement of the remainder of the national board certification application fee upon achievement of national board certification; and (4)  An additional $5,000 bonus per year for each public school teacher who maintains current national board certification and who teaches at: (A)  A school in a focus, priority, or superintendent's zone, or other similar designation, as determined by the department; (B)  A school with a high turnover rate, as determined by the department; or (C)  A hard-to-fill school, as determined by the department." SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $4,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to fund the bonus of $15,000 for each teacher who achieves and maintains a national board certification pursuant to section 302A-706, Hawaii Revised Statutes. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of education for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval; provided that section 3 shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________